sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Flygsport: Flygdräkter; Delar och tillbehör för hängglidare; Hängglidare; Selar för hängglidning; Fallskärmar; Skärmflyg; Selar för skärmflygning och fallskärmshoppning; Höjdmätare för fallskärmshoppning och skärmflygning
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Ala delta y paracaidismo: Monos de salto; Piezas y accesorios para alas delta; Ala delta; Arneses para ala delta; Paracaídas; Parapentes; Arneses para parapente y paracaidismo; Altímetros para paracaidismo y parapente
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Hang Gliding & Skydiving: Air Suits; Hang Glider Parts & Accessories; Hang Gliders; Hang Gliding Harnesses; Parachutes; Paragliders; Paragliding & Skydiving Harnesses; Skydiving & Paragliding Altimeters
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 행글라이딩/스카이다이빙: 에어슈트; 행글라이더 부품 및 액세서리; 행글라이더; 행글라이딩 하네스; 낙하산; 패러글라이더; 패러글라이딩 및 스카이다이빙 하네스; 스카이다이빙 및 패러글라이딩 고도계
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 懸掛式滑翔/跳傘: 跳傘服裝; 滑翔翼零件與配件; 滑翔翼; 滑翔翼吊帶; 降落傘; 飛行傘; 飛行傘與跳傘吊帶; 跳傘與飛行傘高度計
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Drachenfliegen & Fallschirmspringen: Fluganzüge; Ersatzteile & Zubehör für Drachenflieger; Hängegleiter; Drachenflieger-Gurtzeuge; Fallschirme; Gleitschirme; Gurtzeuge für Gleitschirmfliegen & Fallschirmspringen; Höhenmesser für Fallschirmspringen & Gleitschirmfliegen
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Asa-delta e paraquedismo: Uniformes de voo livre; Peças e acessórios para asa delta; Asas-deltas; Arneses para asa-delta; Paraquedas; Parapentes; Arneses para parapente e paraquedismo; Altímetros para paraquedismo e parapente
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Riippuliito ja laskuvarjohyppy: Laskuvarjohyppypuvut; Riippuliitimien osat ja lisävarusteet; Riippuliitimet; Riippuliitovaljaat; Laskuvarjot; Varjoliitimet; Varjoliito- ja laskuvarjohyppyvaljaat; Laskuvarjohypyn ja varjoliidon korkeusmittarit
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Závěsné létání a parašutismus: Létací obleky; Díly a příslušenství k závěsným kluzákům; Rogala; Postroje pro závěsné létání; Padáky; Padákové kluzáky; Postroje na paragliding a parašutismus; Výškoměry na parašutismus a paragliding
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Paracadutismo e volo libero: Tute da paracadutismo; Componenti e accessori per deltaplani; Deltaplani; Imbracature per deltaplano; Paracaduti; Parapendii; Imbracature per parapendio e paracadutismo; Altimetri per paracadutismo e parapendio
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Deltaplane et parachutisme: Combinaisons pour sports aériens; Pièces et accessoires de deltaplanes; Deltaplanes; Harnais de deltaplane; Parachutes; Parapentes; Harnais de parachutisme et sellettes de parapente; Altimètres pour parachutisme et parapente
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Hanggliding og faldskærmsudspring: Flyvedragt; Dele og tilbehør til dragefly; Dragefly; Seler til drageflyvning; Faldskærme; Paraglidere; Seler til paragliding og faldskærmsudspring; Højdemålere til faldskærmsudspring og paragliding
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Letenje zmajem i padobranom: Zračna odijela; Dijelovi i dodaci za ovjesne jedrilice; Ovjesne jedrilice; Pojasevi za letenje zmajem; Padobrani; Paraglideri; Pojasevi za paragliding i padobranstvo; Visinomjeri za padobranstvo i paragliding
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 悬挂式滑翔/跳伞: 空中运动飞行服; 悬挂式滑翔机零件和配件; 悬挂式滑翔机; 悬挂滑翔机吊带; 降落伞; 滑翔伞; 滑翔伞与跳伞吊带; 跳伞与滑翔伞高度计
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Závesné lietanie a parašutizmus: Kombinézy na lietanie; Súčiastky a príslušenstvo pre rogalá; Závesné klzáky; Postroje na závesné klzáky; Padáky; Paraglidisti; Postroje na paragliding a zoskok padákom; Výškomery pre zoskoky padákom a paragliding
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Hanggliding en skydiving: Vliegpakken; Onderdelen en accessoires voor hanggliders; Hanggliders; Harnassen voor deltavliegen; Parachutes; Paragliders; Harnassen voor paragliden en skydiven; Hoogtemeters voor skydiven en paragliden
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Αιωροπτερισμός & ελεύθερη πτώση: Αεροστολές; Εξαρτήματα & αξεσουάρ αιωροπτέρων; Αιωρόπτερα; Εξαρτύσεις ανεμόπτερων; Αλεξίπτωτα; Αλεξίπτωτα πλαγιάς; Εξαρτύσεις αλεξίπτωτου πλαγιάς και ελεύθερης πτώσης; Υψόμετρα ελεύθερης πτώσης και αλεξίπτωτου πλαγιάς
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Yelken Kanat ve Serbest Paraşüt: Uçuş Giysileri; Yelkenkanat parçaları ve aksesuarları; Askılı Planörler; Yelken kanat koşumları; Paraşütler; Yamaç paraşütleri; Yamaç paraşütü ve serbest düşüş koşumları; Serbest düşüş ve yamaç paraşütü altimetreleri
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Asa-delta e paraquedismo: Fatos de queda-livre; Peças e acessórios para asas-deltas; Asas-delta; Arneses para asa-delta; Paraquedas; Parapentes; Arneses para parapente e paraquedismo; Altímetros para paraquedismo e parapente
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Deltaplane și parașutism: Combinezoane; Piese și accesorii pentru deltaplane; Deltaplane; Hamuri pentru deltaplanism; Parașute; Parapante; Hamuri pentru parapantă și parașutism; Altimetre pentru parașutism și parapantism
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Hanggliding og fallskjermhopping: Luftdrakter; Deler og tilbehør til hangglider; Hangglidere; Seler for hanggliding; Fallskjermer; Paraglidere; Seler for paragliding og fallskjermhopping; Høydemålere for fallskjermhopping og paragliding
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Sklandymas ir parašiutizmas: Kombinezonai; Sklandytuvų dalys ir priedai; Sklandyklės; Sklandymo diržai; Parašiutai; Parasparniai; Parasparnių ir šuolių parašiutu diržai; Parašiutizmo ir parasparnių aukščiamačiai
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Dù lượn và nhảy dù: Bộ liền một mảnh chuyên dụng cho các môn thể thao trên không; Phụ kiện và bộ phận diều lượn; Tàu lượn; Đai bảo hộ diều lượn; Dù; Dù lượn; Đai bảo hộ dù lượn & nhảy dù; Máy đo độ cao nhảy dù & dù lượn
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Дельтапланеризм и прыжки с парашютом: Парашютные комбинезоны; Детали и аксессуары для дельтапланов; Дельтапланы; Подвесные системы для дельтапланеризма; Парашюты; Парапланы; Подвесные системы для парапланеризма и парашютного спорта; Высотомеры для парашютного спорта и парапланеризма
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > ร่มร่อนและการเหินเวหา: แอร์สูท; ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับแฮงก์ไกลเดอร์; ร่มร่อน; ฮาร์เนสสำหรับเครื่องร่อน; พาราชูตส์; ร่มร่อน; ฮาร์เนสสำหรับร่มร่อนและกระโดดร่ม; มาตรวัดระดับความสูงสำหรับการกระโดดร่มและร่มร่อน
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Jadralno zmajarstvo in padalstvo: Letalni kombinezoni; Deli in dodatki za jadralne zmaje; Jadralni zmaji; Pasovi za zmajarstvo; Padala; Jadralna padala; Varnostni pasovi za jadralno padalstvo in padalstvo; Višinomeri za padalstvo in jadralno padalstvo
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Paralotniarstwo i spadochroniarstwo: Kostiumy powietrzne; Części i akcesoria do lotni; Lotnie; Uprzęże do lotniarstwa; Spadochrony; Paralotnie; Uprzęże paralotniowe i spadochronowe; Wysokościomierze spadochronowe i paralotniowe
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Делтапланеризъм и скачане с парашут: Въздушни костюми; Части и аксесоари за делтапланери; Делтапланери; Колани за делтапланеризъм; Парашути; Парапланери; Колани за парапланеризъм и скачане с парашут; Висотомери за скачане с парашут и парапланеризъм
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Sárkányrepülés és ejtőernyős ugrás: Légruhák; Sárkányrepülő-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Sárkányrepülők; Sárkányrepülő beülők; Ejtőernyők; Siklóernyők; Siklóernyős és ejtőernyős beülők; Ejtőernyős és siklóernyős magasságmérők
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ハンググライダー・スカイダイビング: エアスーツ; ハンググライダーパーツ＆アクセサリー; ハンググライダー; ハンググライダー用ハーネス; パラシュート; パラグライダー; パラグライダー＆スカイダイビング用ハーネス; スカイダイビング＆パラグライダー用高度計